Tennessee, session 114, SB2494.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 71, Chapter 3, is amended by adding
the following as a new part:
71-3-201.
Notwithstanding a law to the contrary, the governor shall not make a decision
regarding the option to not enroll this state in or to disenroll this state from the summer
electronic benefits transfer program, provided by the food and nutrition service, an
agency of the United States department of agriculture, unless the requirement in § 71-3-
202 has been met.
71-3-202.
The general assembly may authorize by joint resolution for the governor to not
enroll in or to disenroll from the summer electronic benefits transfer program.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2494
012199
- 1 -